test/src/morphology/V-naelguemae68_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `nälgümä: # Verb (68) `nälgümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `nälgümä+V+Inf/mA: `nälgümä
     `nälgümä+V+Inf: `nälgüdäq
     `nälgümä+V+ActPrtPrc: `nälgünüq
     `nälgümä+V+PssPrtPrc: `nälgüt
     `nälgümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `nälgü
     `nälgümä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `nälgüs
     `nälgümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `nälgü
     `nälgümä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `nälgü
